Missouri, session 2026, SB1774.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 64, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 64.296, to read as
follows:
64.296. 1. As used in this section, the following
words and terms shall mean:
(1) "Discriminatory land use policy", any zoning
ordinance, building code requirements, land use ordinance,
development regulation, or other policy that has the effect
of limiting or prohibiting the placement of manufactured
housing without a reasonable and substantial public interest
justification;
(2) "Local government", any county, city, town,
village, or other political subdivision with zoning or land
use authority;
(3) "Modular home", a transportable building unit
designed to be used by itself or to be incorporated with
similar units at a point-of-use into a modular structure to
be used for residential purposes, built to International
Residential Code (IRC code), and certified by the Missouri

SB 1774 2
public service commission as being built in accordance with
the 2021 IRC code;
(4) "Permanent foundation", a system of supports that
is:
(a) Capable of transferring, without failure, into
soil or bedrock, the maximum design load imposed by or upon
the structure and complies with the manufacturer's install
manual; or
(b) Certified by licensed professional engineer under
chapter 327, designed for the home;
(5) "Qualified manufactured home", a manufactured home
that meets all of the following criteria:
(a) Is manufactured on a date not to exceed five years
prior to the date of installation and has removed all parts
that operate only during transport;
(b) Is affixed to a permanent foundation, connected to
the appropriate facilities, and is installed in compliance
with section 700.653;
(c) Has a width of at least twenty feet at its
smallest width measurement or is two stories in height and
oriented on the lot or parcel so that its main entrance door
faces the street;
(d) Has a minimum total living area of nine hundred
square feet;
(e) The foundation enclosure on any qualified
manufactured home shall be a minimum of a block wall or
similar masonry enclosure; and
(f) Is a home built to the standards of the National
Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act
of 1974, 42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq., as amended.
2. (1) A local government shall not adopt or enforce
any zoning ordinance or land use regulation that:

SB 1774 3
(a) Outright bans either modular homes or qualified
manufactured homes in residential zones where other single-
family housing is permitted;
(b) Imposes requirements on modular homes or
manufactured homes that are more restrictive than those
imposed on site-built homes, including, but not limited to,
lot size, setback, appearance, foundation, or age
restrictions;
(c) Unreasonably limits the replacement of existing
manufactured homes with new ones;
(d) Requires special permits or variances for modular
homes or qualified manufactured homes that are not required
for comparable site-built housing; or
(e) Requires a perimeter foundation system for a
modular home or qualified manufactured home that is
incompatible with the structural design of the home.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit
reasonable regulations related to health and safety,
provided such regulations do not create undue burdens
specific to modular homes or qualified manufactured homes.
3. Any local government may adopt and enforce, as a
part of its zoning regulations, compatibility standards
governing the placement of modular homes or qualified
manufactured homes in residential zones within the local
government's jurisdiction. Compatibility standards shall be
adopted, amended, and enforced in the same manner as other
zoning regulations and shall be in addition to any zoning
regulations that are generally applicable to single-family
residences. Any architectural compatibility standards
applied to modular homes or qualified manufactured homes
shall be equivalent to, and not more stringent than, those
standards applied to other single-family residential

SB 1774 4
structures in the same zone. No compatibility standard
shall be adopted or enforced if such standard is not also
required for all other new site-built, single-family
residential construction within the same zone. Nothing in
this section shall be construed as limiting in any way the
authority of local governments to adopt regulations designed
to protect historic properties or historic districts.
Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting in
any way the authority of private citizens to construct
additional requirements through homeowner associations, or
placing additional covenants or restrictions on private land.
4. Any zoning regulation, ordinance, or requirement
that violates this section is void and unenforceable.
5. If any provision of this section or its application
is found to be invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the
remaining provisions or applications of this section, which
shall remain in full force and effect.
Section B. Because of the urgent need of the residents
of Missouri to have fair and equitable zoning regulations
for modular and manufactured homes, section A of this act is
deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby
declared to be an emergency act within the meaning of the
constitution, and section A of this act shall be in full
force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✓